District of Columbia statutes.
42-2703.07

Technical assistance, loans, grants and consultant services.

The Agency may provide eligible persons, sponsors or such individual, private or public corporation, association, group, organization, Eligible State or Local Government Unit, or any other entity with technical assistance, loans, grants or consultant services consistent with the authority of this chapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 307, 25 DCR 5008
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-247, § 2(n), 46 DCR 1100

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2127.
1973 Ed., § 45-1914.